Hawaii statutes.
§576B-204 Simultaneous proceedings.
(a) A tribunal of this State may exercise jurisdiction to establish a support
order if the petition or comparable pleading is filed after a pleading is filed
in another state or a foreign country only if:

(1) The petition or comparable pleading in this State
is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in the other state or the
foreign country for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of
jurisdiction by the other state or the foreign country;

(2) The contesting party timely challenges the
exercise of jurisdiction in the other state or the foreign country; and

(3) If relevant, this State is the home state of the
child.

(b) A tribunal of this State may not exercise
jurisdiction to establish a support order if the petition or comparable
pleading is filed before a petition or comparable pleading is filed in another
state or a foreign country if:

(1) The petition or comparable pleading in the other
state or foreign country is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in
this State for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of
jurisdiction by this State;

(2) The contesting party timely challenges the
exercise of jurisdiction in this State; and

(3) If relevant, the other state or foreign country
is the home state of the child. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next